src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
!! # Tsuut'ina Nouns
! -----
!! ## Classification
!! 1. Always unpossessed nouns: nàk'ús "cloud"
!! 1. Always possessed nouns: sitsì "my head" (body parts, kinship terms)
!! 1. Possessed or unpossessed: tłích'á "dog" vs. silích'à "my dog"

!!  Three (phonological) cases for the possessive prefixes:
!!  # Consonant-initial stem: si- "1SG" tsì "head" -> sitsì "my head"
!!  # Preceding H-tone stem: si- "1SG" V́tsí "nose" -> sítsí "my nose" 
!!  # Vowel-initial stem: si- "1SG" óó "mother" -> sóó "my mother" \\
!!    (cf. ʔinóó "mother" , ʔi- "UNSPEC.POSS" (n)óó;
!!    ```gu- "SOMEONE" óó "mother" -> gwóó gu > gw / _ [oa] ) Cu[oa] > Cw[oa]?```

!! Periphrastic / non-morphological constructions are used for always
!! unpossessed nouns: sá(à) nàk'ús "my cloud", ná(à) ʔidínít'ùgù
!! yiitł'áłí "your vehicle")

!! ## Lexicons

LEXICON AlwaysUnpossessedNouns !!= * @CODE@ never Px
diná # "man" ;
gútł'ìs # "mud" ;
ʔidínít'ùgù% yiitł'áłí # "automobile" ;
nàk'ús # "cloud" ;
ts'ìká # "woman" ;


LEXICON AlwaysPossessedNouns  !!= * @CODE@ always Px, body part, kinship
tsì # "head" ;
0tsí:%^VHtsí # "nose" ;
kòlà # "husband" ; 
ts'òyá # "wife" ;       ! CHECK: unpossessed form, as well?


LEXICON UnpossessedNouns  !!= * @CODE@ Px or not, here not. Cf. PossessedNouns
kù # "fire" ;
más # "knife" ;
tìs # "cane, walking stick" ;
tłích'á # "dog" ;
tú # "water" ;
xoní # "buffalo" ;
zos # "snow; year" ;

LEXICON PossessedNouns  !!= * @CODE@ Px or not, here Px. Cf. UnpossessedNouns
kùwà # "fire" ;     ! CHECK
lích'à # "dog" ; 
mázà # "knife" ;
tìsà # "cane" ;
tùwà # "water" ;
xonà # "buffalo" ;
zosà # "snow; year" ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
